Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.065

District boundary changes—Filing with county auditor.

Any district boundary changes shall be filed for recording with the county auditor by the educational service district superintendent within thirty days after the changes have been approved in accordance with this chapter. The superintendent shall submit both legal descriptions and maps. District boundary changes shall be effective the date specified in the educational service district superintendent's order.

[ 2012 c 186 s 2; 1999 c 315 s 204.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.